California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 2271.1, an additional levy made prior to January 1, 1976, pursuant to the provisions of Section 2271 to pay costs mandated by the 1974 amendments to the Fair Labor Standards Act, or regulations issued pursuant thereto, shall not be invalidated and may continue to be made to meet recurring costs resulting from any program or activity undertaken or implemented by a local agency in order to comply with such amendments or regulations, notwithstanding the repeal, stay or invalidation of such amendments or regulations, if the repeal, stay or invalidation of such amendments or regulations occurs or occurred after the local agency has made such additional levy or has incurred continuing obligations in order to implement the mandated program or activity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 586.)
-------------------------------------------

2271.2.

The Controller shall issue, and shall revise, as needed, advisory guidelines to assist local agencies in determining when an additional property tax rate may be levied pursuant to Section 2271.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 309.)
-------------------------------------------

2272.

A local agency may levy, or have levied on its behalf, a rate in addition to the maximum property tax rate established pursuant to this chapter (commencing with Section 2201) for the purpose of complying with Sections 5302.5, 6467, 6468, 8809, and 10206 of the Streets and Highways Code or with Section 43240 of the Government Code or with Article 1 (commencing with Section 13371) of Chapter 7.5 of Division 6 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------

2273.

(a) A local agency may levy, or have levied on its behalf, a rate in addition to the maximum property tax rate established pursuant to this chapter (commencing with Section 2201) for the purpose of meeting the costs of written contractual obligations, leases and agreements, including determinations made pursuant to the Meyers-Milias-Brown Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code), which were entered into, or authorized by the governing body or by the voters of such agency, prior to January 1, 1973, if:

(1) The local agency incurred no costs or budgeted no expenditures under the contractual obligation or agreement during the 1972–1973 fiscal year but will incur such costs in subsequent fiscal years, or

(2) The local agency did incur costs pursuant to the contractual obligation or agreement in the 1972–1973 fiscal year, but in subsequent fiscal years such costs increase in an amount which exceeds either the growth rate in the local agency’s assessed value or its growth rate in population and cost of living as determined pursuant to Section 2212 and Sections 2227 or 2228.

(b) The additional rate which may be levied to meet costs described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be that rate in each fiscal year which produces the amount of revenue needed to meet the actual annual costs of the contract or obligation.

(c) The additional rate which may be levied in each fiscal year to meet costs described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be that rate which produces an amount of revenue equal to the difference between (i) the cost of the contract for the current year and (ii) the adjusted base year cost of the contract. Such adjusted base year cost shall be determined as follows: (i) for the 1973–1974 fiscal year, the actual cost of the contract in the 1972–1973 fiscal year shall be multiplied by either the percentage increase in population and the cost of living or the percentage increase in assessed value which is applicable to the local agency, whichever is greater. The product of such multiplication plus the actual cost of the contract during the 1972–1973 fiscal year shall be the adjusted base cost of the contract; (ii) for each subsequent fiscal year, the adjusted base year cost of the contract of the prior year shall be multiplied by either the percentage increase in the cost of living and population or the percentage increase in assessed value which is applicable to the local agency, whichever is greater. The product of such multiplication plus the adjusted base year cost of the contract in the prior fiscal year shall be the adjusted base cost of the contract in the current year. For the 1981–82 fiscal year, the assessed value for the 1980–81 fiscal year shall be multiplied by four prior to calculating the percentage increase in assessed value.

(d) No local agency may levy an additional rate as provided in this section after the termination of the contractual obligation or agreement described in subdivision (a); provided that a local agency may continue to levy an additional rate equal to the rate levied for the entire last year of such a contract or agreement if (i) the local agency enters a new contractual obligation which provides for substantially similar kinds of services or goods as the terminated contract, and (ii) the new contractual obligation concerns personal services, consumable goods or personal property and does not in any manner involve real property as defined in Section 104.

The additional property tax rate authorized by this section shall apply (i) to contractual obligations arising from the exercise of options and (ii) to contractual obligations arising from contingent promises. Except as specifically provided by this section, the additional property tax rate authorized by this section does not apply to contractual obligations incurred by mutual agreement of the contracting parties after January 1, 1973.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1208, Sec. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

2273.1.

The provisions of Section 2273 shall apply to a contract or lease signed after January 1, 1973, if a local agency, in anticipation of such contract, shall have taken formal action prior to January 1, 1973, to implement one or more projects to be acquired or constructed pursuant to such contract.

“Formal action to implement any one or more projects” means:

(a) The incurring of a liability for a substantial portion of an architectural or engineering contract relating to the project; or

(b) The acquisition of land or improvements for the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------

2273.2.

If, prior to January 1, 1973, a local agency was a party to any contract or lease, the terms of which provide (1) that the local agency shall make payments to the federal government, the State of California or any other local agency and (2) that the governing body of such local agency shall, whenever necessary, levy an ad valorem property tax sufficient to provide for all payments under the contract or lease in a timely manner, such local agency may levy, or have levied on its behalf, a rate in addition to the maximum property tax rate established pursuant to this chapter (commencing with Section 2201) for the purpose of making such payments as are required by such contract or lease; provided, that, the provisions of this section shall apply to a contract or lease signed after January 1, 1973, which contains the terms stated in (1) and (2) above if the terms of such contract or lease are designed to prevent an increase in the burden on the taxpayers of the local agency by means of providing for a reduction in payments under a contract or lease signed before January 1, 1973, to which this section is applicable, in amounts at least equal to the payments required under the contract or lease signed after January 1, 1973.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1261.)
-------------------------------------------

2274.

(a) In the event of an emergency which constitutes a danger to the public health, safety or welfare, or of a general disaster, which requires a local agency to incur additional costs which cannot be met under the maximum property tax rates provided by this chapter (commencing with Section 2201), a local agency may levy, or have levied on its behalf, an additional rate which will produce 1 percent of the amount produced by its maximum property tax rate. Such a rate shall be authorized by a two-thirds vote of the governing body and shall be levied for one year only.

In the event that the property tax rate has been set when an additional rate is authorized pursuant to this subdivision, such additional rate may be levied in the next following fiscal year.

(b) If the additional rate authorized by subdivision (a) is not sufficient to meet the costs incurred as a result of the emergency or general disaster, a local agency may, by resolution, request the Controller to authorize an additional amount of ad valorem property taxation in excess of that authorized pursuant to subdivision (a).

The local agency shall, upon request of the Controller, provide the Controller with such facts and evidence as will enable him to authorize an additional amount pursuant to the provisions of this subdivision.

Upon receipt of the resolution requesting the authorization of an additional amount, the Controller shall hold a public hearing within the jurisdiction of the local agency or as near thereto as is practicable. At the conclusion of the hearing he shall authorize an additional amount if he makes the following findings: (1) An emergency or general disaster does exist the costs of which cannot be met under the agency’s maximum property tax rate and under the additional tax rate provided in subdivision (a). (2) Such costs are the responsibility of the local agency and cannot be met from revenue sources other than the property tax. (3) Such costs are not within the immediate control of the local agency but are due rather to general economic, environmental, or social conditions, or any of them, or acts of God. Environmental conditions shall include orders of the State Water Resources Control Board or regional water quality control boards. (4) The emergency or general disaster endangers public health, safety or welfare.

The additional amount authorized pursuant to this subdivision may be raised during a single fiscal year or, at the discretion of the local agency, a portion of such amount may be raised in each of several fiscal years.

In any fiscal year a local agency may levy, or have levied on its behalf, a rate in addition to the maximum property tax rate established pursuant to this chapter which will be sufficient to produce the amount authorized pursuant to this subdivision, or the portion thereof which the local agency has determined will be raised in such fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 457.)
-------------------------------------------

2275.

A local agency may levy, or have levied on its behalf, a rate in addition to the maximum property tax rate established pursuant to this chapter (commencing with Section 2201) to pay the cost of interest and redemption charges, together with any reserve or sinking funds required in connection therewith, on any note or other evidence of indebtedness which such agency is authorized by statute to issue in the event of emergencies involving major damage to, and destruction of, such agency’s works or facilities. Such rate shall be levied without regard to the provisions of Section 2274.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------

2276.

A local agency to which Section 2267 is applicable, may levy, or have levied on its behalf, a rate in addition to the maximum property tax rate established pursuant to Section 2267 for the purpose of repaying any indebtedness which was incurred in order to pay the operating costs of such agency during the fiscal years in which an error or omission occurred in determining the property tax rate for such agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------

2277.

A local agency may levy, or have levied on its behalf, a rate in addition to the maximum property tax rate established pursuant to this chapter (commencing with Section 2201) for the purpose of paying the actual cost of holding an election pursuant to the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 2285).

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------

2278.

In the event that a local agency is required to pay or is authorized to collect any fees, assessments, charges or obligations as a term or condition of a “governmental reorganization,” as such term is defined in Section 2295, the local agency may levy, or have levied on its behalf, a rate, in addition to the maximum property tax rate established pursuant to this chapter, for the purpose of paying or collecting the actual amount of such fees, assessments, charges, or obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------

2279.1.

A local agency may levy, or have levied on its behalf, a rate in addition to the maximum property tax rate established pursuant to this chapter for interest and redemption charges on amounts borrowed pursuant to Section 54902.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2279 by Stats. 1979, Ch. 516.)
-------------------------------------------

2280.

A special district may levy, or have levied on its behalf, a rate in addition to the maximum property tax rate established pursuant to this chapter in order to pay the extraordinary costs of purchasing electricity for use for street lighting which was in operating condition in the 1972–73 fiscal year. This section shall apply only to special districts that were in existence on January 1, 1976, and which have as their sole and exclusive purpose the provision of street lighting services. Such additional rate shall be determined in the following manner:

(1) The special district shall determine the actual cost of electricity used for street lighting purposes during the 1972–73 fiscal year.

(2) The special district shall then determine the property tax rate which, applied to such district’s assessed valuation in the 1972–73 fiscal year, would have produced an amount of revenue equivalent to the costs determined pursuant to subdivision (1).

(3) Annually, the special district shall determine whether the property tax rate determined pursuant to subdivision (2) would be increased if such rate were adjusted as provided in Section 2266. If such property tax rate would be increased, it shall be adjusted in the manner provided in Section 2266.

(4) The property tax rate determined pursuant to subdivision (2), as such rate may have been adjusted pursuant to subdivision (3), shall then be applied to the district’s assessed valuation for the current fiscal year. The resulting amount shall represent the cost of electricity for street lighting purposes which shall be funded, during the current fiscal year, out of such district’s maximum property tax rate.

(5) The amount determined pursuant to subdivision (4) shall be subtracted from the actual cost to the district for the current fiscal year of electricity for street lighting which was in operating condition in the 1972–73 fiscal year. The amount resulting from such subtraction shall represent such district’s extraordinary cost of purchasing electricity for street lighting purposes and the special district may levy such additional property tax rate as may be necessary to produce an amount of revenue equivalent to such extraordinary costs. If the amount resulting from such subtraction is a negative amount, the special district shall reduce its property tax rate as may be necessary to produce an amount of revenue which, when deducted from the actual cost to the district for the current fiscal year of electricity for street lighting, will not result in a negative balance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

2280.01.

(a) A local agency may levy, or have levied on its behalf, a rate in addition to the maximum property tax rate established pursuant to this chapter for purposes authorized by this section.

(b) In the event that a local agency desires to levy a property tax rate for a specified purpose, it shall submit a proposal to levy such a tax to the qualified voters thereof for approval. The proposal shall specify the maximum rate to be levied.

(c) An election held pursuant to this section shall be called, held and conducted in the same manner as required by Article 6 (commencing with Section 2285). 

(d) In the event that the qualified voters of a local agency approve an additional property tax rate as provided in this section, such tax rate may be levied for the purpose specified in the ballot proposition.

(e) Once the purpose for which the additional property tax rate was authorized has been accomplished, the additional rate shall terminate.

(f) The proposal may specify a date on which the special property tax rate shall terminate.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2280 by Stats. 1979, Ch. 516.)
-------------------------------------------

2280.1.

A city may levy, or have levied on its behalf, a rate in addition to the maximum tax rate established pursuant to this chapter in order to comply with the provisions of Section 43073 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 309.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Tax Rate Limit Elections [2285. - 2289.]

2285.

For the purposes of this article, the term “qualified voter of the local agency” means a voter who meets the specific qualifications, if any, set forth for voters of that local agency for other purposes. If no such specific qualifications exist, the term means a registered voter, as defined in the Elections Code, residing within the area within which the election will be held; if there are no registered voters within that area, the term means a landowner, in which case each landowner shall have one vote. If such landowner is a partnership, joint tenancy or tenancy in common, the vote to which such landowner is entitled may be cast by any of the partners, joint tenants or tenants in common; provided that only one such vote shall be cast on behalf of the landowner. If such landowner is a corporation, the vote to which such corporation is entitled may be cast by any officer of such corporation who is empowered to act on behalf of the corporation.

As used in this section “landowner” means any person or corporation shown on the last equalized assessment roll as the owner of land; provided that where such person or corporation is no longer the owner, the term shall mean any person or corporation entitled to be shown as the owner on the next assessment roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 309.)
-------------------------------------------

2286.

(a) No local agency formed after the effective date of this chapter shall levy, or have levied on its behalf, any property tax rate, except an additional property tax rate authorized pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 2270) of this chapter, unless a maximum property tax rate has been approved for such agency. If an election is held on the formation of a local agency, the maximum property tax rate for such agency shall be included in describing the local agency on the ballot in the formation question.

(b) In the event that a local agency which was in existence on the effective date of this chapter desires to change its maximum property tax rate, the governing body of such agency shall call a special election, pursuant to the provisions of this article, to approve a new maximum property tax rate for the agency.

(c) No maximum property tax rate described in subdivision (a) or (b) shall be approved except by a majority vote of the qualified voters of that local agency voting on the issue.

(d) Subdivisions (a), (b) and (c) of this section shall not apply to an improvement district formed prior to, or after, the effective date of this chapter for the purpose of levying an ad valorem tax as defined in Section 2202 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for the purpose of apportioning the costs of facilities and services made available by a local agency, so long as the total property tax rate within such improvement district does not exceed the maximum rate which could be levied upon the property therein by a local agency without regard to the existence of such improvement district.

(e) Subdivisions (a), (b) and (c) shall not apply to an improvement district formed for the purpose of issuing bonds if the issuance of such bonds has been approved by the electorate of such improvement district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1136.)
-------------------------------------------

2287.5.

Whenever a local agency is formed without an election, there may be submitted to the agency declaring the formation, at the time of formation or within 30 days thereafter, consents to maximum property tax rate from all of the qualified voters of the local agency and, upon receipt of all consents, the maximum tax rate shall be declared approved by the agency declaring formation.

All consents to maximum tax rate shall be on forms provided by the agency declaring formation and shall contain substantially the language that would appear on the ballot if a maximum property tax rate election were to be held. Each consent shall show the name and address of the qualified voter, whose signature must be notarized. All consents shall be for the same maximum property tax rate. The county clerk shall verify the signatures on all consents and that the consents constitute all of the qualified voters in the local agency prior to a declaration of approval of the maximum property tax rate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 45.)
-------------------------------------------

2288.

A maximum property tax rate election held by a local agency formed under a law that does not provide a procedure for elections shall be conducted by the county elections official, as follows:

(a) The election shall be held not less than 74 days nor more than 120 days following the call of the election by the governing body of the local agency. The call of the election shall specify whether the election shall be by mailed ballots or not.

(b) Not less than 15 days nor more than 30 days before the election, the county elections official shall compile the index of voters eligible to vote in the election as of the 30th day preceding the election, establish the election board, precinct boards, and precincts, as needed, and mail out the ballots or sample ballots.

(c) Except as provided herein, an election subject to this section shall be called, conducted, and canvassed as provided in the Elections Code for the calling, conducting, and canvassing of general elections.

(d) The local agency shall reimburse the county in full for the services performed by the county clerk upon presentation of a bill to the local agency.

(e) If the governing body of a local agency authorizes the use of mailed ballots pursuant to Section 2287, the procedure to be used in mailing and canvassing the ballots shall be the procedure prescribed in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 3000) of Division 3 and in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 15000) of Division 15 of the Elections Code for the mailing and canvassing of vote by mail ballots. However, a ballot shall be mailed to each qualified voter and an application for a ballot shall not be required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 508, Sec. 122.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2289.

Whenever possible, elections to approve maximum property tax rates shall be consolidated with other elections. In the event that an election to approve a maximum property tax rate is not consolidated with another election, the governing body calling the election shall state, in the resolution calling the election, the reasons why such consolidation is impracticable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Governmental Reorganization: Effect on Maximum Property Tax Rates [2295. - 2299.]

2295.

As used in this article “governmental reorganization” means any formation of, annexation to, detachment from, consolidation of, dissolution of, or other territorial adjustment in the boundaries of, a local agency. “Governmental reorganization” includes those boundary adjustments of local agencies which are not subject to the provisions of Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 54773) of Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 or of Division 1 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 6 of the Government Code, as well as those boundary adjustments of local agencies which are subject to such provisions of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------

2296.

Except as provided in Section 2263.2, whenever a governmental reorganization occurs, the maximum property tax rate for any local agency whose boundaries are changed by such reorganization shall be determined as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------

2297.

In the event that the boundaries of a local agency are altered by a governmental reorganization, or that a local agency becomes responsible, as a result of a governmental reorganization, for providing a program or service it has not heretofore provided, the maximum property tax rate for such an agency, after the reorganization has occurred, shall continue to be the maximum property tax rate which had been established, pursuant to the provisions of this article or of Article 4, for such agency prior to the reorganization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1085.)
-------------------------------------------

2298.

In the event that a governmental reorganization makes it necessary or desirable for a local agency to exceed the maximum property tax rate provided in Section 2297, the governing body of such agency shall call an election pursuant to the provisions of Article 6 to establish a new maximum property tax rate for such agency. Such an election may be consolidated with any election which may be called on the proposed governmental reorganization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------

2299.

In the event than an election is required in order to approve and effectuate a governmental reorganization, the impartial analysis of the governmental reorganization prepared for the ballot pamphlet shall indicate the maximum property tax rate which will be applicable in the event the governmental reorganization is approved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Functional Consolidation: Effect on Maximum Property Tax Rates [2305. - 2309.]

2305.

As used in this article “functional consolidation” means the transfer, from one local agency to another, of both of the following: (1) the responsibility for providing a program or a service to an area within the jurisdiction of the transferring agency and (2) the responsibility for levying a property tax rate within such area to pay the cost of such service or program. Functional consolidation does not refer to any transfer of responsibility for providing a program or a service when such transfer occurs as a result of a “governmental reorganization” as such term is defined in Section 2295; in such event, the maximum property tax rates for any affected local agency shall be determined solely as provided in Article 7 (commencing with Section 2295) of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1085.)
-------------------------------------------

2306.

Whenever a functional consolidation occurs, the maximum property tax rate for any local agency affected by such functional consolidation shall be determined as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------

2307.

The local agency which transfers a program or service shall reduce its maximum property tax rate as provided in this section. Such reduction shall be effective beginning with the fiscal year after the transfer has occurred.

(a) The local agency shall determine the actual cost of providing the transferred program or service during the last full fiscal year in which such function or service was provided.

(b) The local agency shall determine the amount of the costs determined pursuant to subdivision (a) which are attributable to expenses for general administration and capital outlay and which cannot be transferred to the agency assuming the responsibility for providing the program or service; provided that such amount shall not exceed 10 percent of the amount determined pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) The local agency shall subtract the amount determined pursuant to subdivision (b) from the amount determined pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) The local agency shall determine the property tax rate which would have been required to produce the amount determined pursuant to subdivision (c) during the last full fiscal year in which the transferred program or service was provided and shall reduce its maximum property tax rate thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------

2308.

The maximum property tax rate for a local agency assuming the responsibility for providing a program or service and for levying a tax to pay the cost thereof, as a result of a functional consolidation, shall be the maximum property tax rate for such agency established prior to the functional consolidation plus such additional rate as may be necessary to pay the actual costs of providing such program or service.

The Controller may audit any rate imposed under this section and if he determines that the rate exceeds a rate which would be necessary to pay the actual costs incurred as a result of functional consolidation, he shall immediately notify the local agency of such determination and the local agency shall reduce its property tax rate by an appropriate amount for the next succeeding fiscal year. In the event that a local agency fails to make such a reduction in its property tax rate, the Controller shall request the Attorney General to bring an action under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1084) of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure to force a reduction in the rate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 309.)
-------------------------------------------

2309.

Any adjustment in the maximum property tax rate of a local agency made pursuant to Section 2308 shall only be made in the first full fiscal year after the functional consolidation has occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Reporting Tax Levies [2325. - 2326.]

2325.

Annually, no later than 15 days after the property tax rate for a local agency has been fixed, each local agency shall report to the Controller, on a form to be specified by the Controller, the property tax rate levied by, or on behalf of, the agency for the current fiscal year. That information shall show the amount of the rate, if any, levied pursuant to Sections 2260, 2261, 2262, 2263, 2263.1, 2263.2, 2264, 2265, 2266, 2266.1, 2267, 2270, 2271, 2272, 2273, 2274, 2275, 2276, 2277, 2278, 2279 and 2280. That information shall also show any property tax rate authorized or levied pursuant to the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 2285), Article 7 (commencing with Section 2295), and Article 8 (commencing with Section 2305). Information with respect to any rate levied pursuant to Section 2270 shall also indicate the rate levied to pay interest and redemption charges on bonded indebtedness, the rate levied to pay the cost of retirement and pension benefits and the rate levied to make payments to special funds as required by charter. The Controller shall, by regulation, require any tax rate exempt from rate limitations imposed by this chapter to be reported in the manner specified by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1281, Sec. 22.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

2325.1.

In the event that the Controller determines that an error has occurred in establishing a property tax rate levied pursuant to any provision of this chapter, he shall immediately notify the local agency of such error and the local agency shall reduce its property tax rate by an appropriate amount for the next succeeding fiscal year. In the event that a local agency fails to make such a reduction in its property tax rate, the Controller shall request the Attorney General to bring an action under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1084) of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure to force a reduction in the rate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 309.)
-------------------------------------------

2326.

If a local agency fails to file the report required by Section 2325 by October 15, the Controller, in the succeeding fiscal year, shall reduce by 10 percent or five thousand dollars ($5,000), whichever is less, the payment he is required to make to such agency based on claims filed pursuant to Section 16113 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. COLLECTION OF TAXES [2501. - 3205.]



  CHAPTER 1. Medium of Payment [2501. - 2516.]

2501.

Taxes shall be paid only in the mediums permitted by this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

2502.

Taxes may be paid in legal tender or in money receivable in payment of taxes by the United States. The tax collector shall have the right to refuse the payment in coins of property taxes, penalties and interest, and any other charges associated with the payment of property taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 523, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2503.

A tax levied for a special purpose shall be paid in such funds as may be directed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

2503.1.

As used in this division, “electronic funds transfer” means any transfer of funds, other than a transaction originated by check, draft, or similar paper instrument, which is initiated through an electronic terminal, telephonic instrument, or computer or magnetic tape so as to order, instruct, or authorize a financial institution to credit or debit an account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 194, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2503.2.

(a) The tax collector for any city, county, or city and county may, in his or her discretion, accept electronic funds transfers in payment for a purchase at a tax sale, of any tax, assessment, or on a redemption.

(b) The tax collector for any city, county, or city and county may, in his or her discretion, require any taxpayer, or any paying agent of a taxpayer or taxpayers, who makes an aggregate payment of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or more on the two most recent regular installments on the secured roll or on the one installment of the most recent unsecured tax roll, to make subsequent payments by electronic funds transfer.

(c) Any taxpayer or paying agent making payment by electronic funds transfer shall provide any supporting documentation and electronic information as requested by the tax collector. An electronic funds transfer made pursuant to this section shall be made to the bank account designated by the tax collector.

(d) Any costs incurred by the tax collector as a result of the acceptance of electronic funds transfers pursuant to this section shall be considered administrative costs of tax collection, except that if for any reason the electronic funds transfer is not completed, those costs shall be recovered as provided in subdivision (g).

(e) The acceptance of an electronic funds transfer shall constitute payment of a tax, assessment, or redemption as of the date of acceptance when, but not before, the transfer has been completed. An electronic funds transfer is completed by acceptance by the bank designated by the tax collector of the payment specified by the originator’s payment order.

(f) If an electronic funds transfer is not accepted for any reason, any record of payment entered on any official record indicating the acceptance of that transfer shall be canceled, and the tax or assessment shall be a lien as if no payment has been attempted. When a cancellation of a record of payment is made, the canceling officer shall record the cancellation on the record that contained the notation of payment, and immediately shall cause a written notice of cancellation to be sent to the person attempting the electronic funds transfer.

(g) Upon notice of nonacceptance of an electronic funds transfer, the tax collector may charge the person who attempted the electronic funds transfer a fee not to exceed the costs of processing the transfer, providing notice of nonacceptance to that person, and making required cancellations on the tax roll. The amount of any fee charged pursuant to this subdivision shall be set by the governing body of the relevant city, county, or city and county, and may be added to the tax bill and collected in the same manner as costs recovered pursuant to Section 2621.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 194, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2504.

As used in this division, “negotiable paper” means checks, drafts, and money orders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 340, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2505.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the tax collector or treasurer for any city or county may in his or her discretion accept negotiable paper in payment of any tax, or assessment, or on a redemption.

(b) The tax collector of a county shall accept a certificate of eligibility to pay all or any part of any ad valorem property tax, special assessment, or other charge or user fee appearing on the county tax bill. The tax collector, treasurer, or other official charged with the duty of collecting taxes for a chartered city which levies and collects its own property taxes shall accept a certificate of eligibility to pay all or any part of any ad valorem property tax, special assessment, or other charge or user fee appearing
 on the tax bill of such city. A certificate for partial payment shall not be accepted unless accompanied by an amount sufficient to fully pay the remaining ad valorem property taxes, special assessment, or other charge or fee appearing on the respective tax bill installment.

(c) For the 1978–79 fiscal year and thereafter, except as to those amounts which can be paid by a certificate pursuant to subdivision (c), the tax collector shall not accept a certificate of eligibility to pay all or part of any installment if tendered after the delinquency date thereof, unless accompanied by an amount sufficient to fully pay any delinquent taxes, assessments, costs, penalties, interest, fees or other charges resulting from the delinquency or delinquencies.

(d) In no event shall a certificate of eligibility be accepted later than the expiration date designated
 thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 387, Sec. 17.   (SB 205)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2506.

The acceptance of negotiable paper constitutes a payment of a tax, assessment, or redemption as of the date of acceptance when, but not before, the negotiable paper is duly paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 155.)